Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 4 METROPOLITAN WATER DISTRICTS
32-4-412. Exclusion of incorporated areas.

The governing body of any municipality, which is partly or wholly within the boundaries of the district, may adopt a resolution or enact an ordinance declaring that the public convenience and necessity require the exclusion of the territory within the boundaries of the municipality from the district, which resolution or ordinance shall set forth the boundaries of the territory proposed to be excluded.

If the district has an outstanding bonded indebtedness, the governing body of the municipality, before finally adopting the resolution or enacting the ordinance, shall submit to the electors of the territory proposed to be excluded from the district, at an election held for that purpose, the proposition of excluding the territory from the district. Any election may be held separately or may be held jointly or concurrently with any primary, general, or regular election held under the laws of the state of Colorado. The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S., with the governing body of the municipality following the procedures and performing the functions of the board of directors of the district pursuant to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The resolution or ordinance calling the election shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness of the district was incurred, the remaining amount of principal of the indebtedness, and the terms of repayment. The resolution or ordinance shall also designate the date upon which the election shall be held. The form of the ballot shall be as follows: "For Exclusion" and "Against Exclusion". After the results have been surveyed, the clerk of the municipality shall certify the results to the governing body of the municipality who shall certify the results to the board of directors of the district.

In the event that the district has no outstanding indebtedness, the governing body of the municipality, before finally adopting the resolution or enacting the ordinance, shall hold a public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be given by publication in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the municipality or county.

Within sixty days after receipt of a copy of the resolution or certification of survey of votes showing that the exclusion has been approved, the board of directors of the district may enact a resolution setting forth the same boundaries and, upon the taking effect of its resolution, shall forthwith transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

The director of the division of local government, upon receipt of a copy of the resolution of the board of directors of the district, shall forthwith issue a certificate reciting that the territory described in the resolution has been duly excluded from the district named, according to the laws of the state of Colorado. The exclusion of the territory shall be deemed effective upon the date of issuance of the certificate, and the validity of the exclusion shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding which has not been commenced within three months from that date. The division shall forthwith transmit to the governing body of such municipality and to the board of directors of the district a copy of the certificate, and the clerk of the governing body shall forthwith record the copy in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which the municipality is located.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 593, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-12.

L. 70:

p. 281, § 76.

L. 71:

p. 961, § 5.

L. 76:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 600, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1504, § 53, effective July 15.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 893, § 135, effective January 1, 1993.

32-4-413. Liability of property included.

Property situated within the boundaries of territory added to a metropolitan water district shall be subject to all taxes levied by such district after the inclusion of such territory, and shall be subject to all the bonded indebtedness of such district whether incurred by the district prior to or subsequent to such inclusion.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 594, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-13.

32-4-414. Liability of property excluded.

Property situated within the boundaries of territory excluded from a metropolitan water district shall remain subject to that portion of all taxes levied by such district necessary for the payment of principal and interest of any bonded indebtedness of the district outstanding at the time of such exclusion.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 595, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-14.

32-4-415. Budget law.

The provisions of the local government budget law shall apply to metropolitan water districts.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 595, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 89-13-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-15.

32-4-416. Dissolution of district.

Any metropolitan water district may be dissolved in the manner provided in part 7 of article 1 of this title; except that the question of dissolution or the plan for dissolution shall be submitted to the eligible electors of the district. The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 70:

p. 312, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-13-16.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1504, § 54, effective July 15.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1623, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 894, § 136, effective January 1, 1993.